Washington statutes.
RCW 36.04.330

Stevens county.

Stevens county shall consist of the territory bounded as follows, to wit: Commencing at the southeast corner of township thirty north, range forty-two east of the Willamette Meridian; thence north to the northeast corner of said township; thence west to the southwest corner of section thirty-four, township thirty-one north, range forty-two east; thence north along the center line of townships thirty-one, thirty-two, thirty-three, thirty-four, thirty-five and thirty-six in said range forty-two east to the northwest corner of section three in township thirty-six north; thence west to the northwest corner of section three, township thirty-six north, range forty-one east; thence north along the center line of township thirty-seven to the northwest corner of section three in said township; thence east to the northeast corner of said township; thence north to the northwest corner of township thirty-eight, range forty-two east; thence east to the northwest corner of section three of said township; thence north along the center line of township thirty-nine to the northwest corner of section three in said township; thence east to the northeast corner of said township; thence north to the northern boundary line of the state; thence west to where said boundary line intersects the middle of the channel of the Kettle river; thence south along said channel to its confluence with the Columbia river; thence continuing south along the middle of the channel of the Columbia river to its confluence with the Spokane river; thence easterly along the channel of the Spokane to the Little Spokane river; thence north to the township line separating townships twenty-nine and thirty; thence east to the place of beginning.

[(i) 1 H.C. s30; 1888 p 70; 1879 p 203; 1869 p 297; 1867 p 50; 1864 p 70; 1863 p 6; RRS s 3957. (ii) 1899 c 18 s 1; RRS s 3934.]